Wyoming, session 2025, HB0034.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1.

(a) There is appropriated seven hundred fifty
thousand dollars ($750,000.00) from funds deposited in the
highway fund under W.S. 39‑17‑111(d)(iv) to the governor's
office for purposes of conducting an efficiency study of
the department of transportation in accordance with this
HB0034

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0294
section. Funds appropriated under this section shall not be
distributed to the governor's office before April 1, 2025
and only if this bill becomes effective under section 2 of
this act. The study funded by this appropriation shall:

(i) Be conducted by an independent third party;

(ii) Be conducted in consultation with the joint
transportation, highways and military affairs interim
committee;

(iii) Evaluate the department of
transportation's rules, policies and procedures;

(iv) Review the department of transportation's
staffing and resources and the distribution and number of
staff and resources around the state of Wyoming;

(v) Review the department of transportation's
design and construction practices and technologies,
including the department's standard specifications for
engineering;

HB0034

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0294
(vi) Conduct an anonymous survey of all
employees of the department of transportation asking for
employees to identify areas for increasing efficiencies
within the department;

(vii) Determine whether efficiencies or cost
savings can be gained;

(viii) Provide recommendations for the
department of transportation to achieve the efficiencies
identified in paragraphs (vi) and (vii) of this subsection;

(ix) Include a final report, containing the
potential efficiencies identified, recommendations to
achieve those efficiencies and any recommendations for
changes to statute, rule, policy or procedure to the
governor, the department of transportation and the joint
transportation, highways and military affairs interim
committee not later than July 1, 2026.

Section 2.

HB0034

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0294
(a) Subject to subsection (b) of this section, this
act is effective immediately upon completion of all acts
necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article
4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution.

(b) This act shall only be effective if:

(i) 2025 House Bill 0029 is enacted into law;
and

(ii) 2025 House Bill 0033 is enacted into law.

(END)
HB0034